Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 2 Board of Land Commissioners

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009 ch. 168, § 501, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “All property and duties of the Wyoming centennial commission are transferred to the state board of land commissioners.”

Cross references. —

As to powers and duties in connection with Carey Act lands, see §

36-7-201

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).